src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL !!= @CODE@
+Cond-Aux2:%> # ;
+Imm+Pres:%>a # ;
+Simp+Pres:%>áng # ;
+Dir+Past:%>an # ;
+NonFact:%>áng # ;
+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>áng # ;
+Pres+Hab:%>anggang # ;
+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>angang # ;
+Dir+Past+Hab:%>iinii # ;
+Interr+Past+Hab:%>áangaa # ;
+Indir+Past+Hab:%>áangaan # ;
+Interr+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaʼáa # ;
+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaʼáang # ;
+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdláa # ;
+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdláang # ;
+Cert+Pres:%>ʼahlánggang # ;
+Cert+Past:%>ʼahlánggan # ;
+Cert+Past+Hab:%>ʼahlánggíinii # ;
+Cert+Rel:%>ʼahláns # ;
+Ints+Past:%>áaʼahlang # ;
+Cont:%>áaʼahlanggaa # ;
+Ctfact+Pres:%>áaʼahlanggang # ;
+Rflx:%>ʼahl # ;
+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>angʼwaa # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>angʼwaang # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>angʼwaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab:%>angʼanggang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>angʼangang # ;
+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaaʼáng # ;
+Neg+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaaʼánggang # ;
+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdläʼáng # ;
+Neg+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdläʼánggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>angʼangʼwaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>angʼangʼwaang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>angʼangʼwaa%.ang # ;


LEXICON CLASS-II !!= @CODE@
+V:íi               CLASS-II-STEM-1-INFL ;
+V:áay              CLASS-II-STEM-2-INFL ;
+V+Ext:íidaal       CLASS-AAL-INFL  ;
+V+Circum:íigwaang  CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:íigyaʼáng            CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:íigyaʼáang           CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Pl:íigyaʼáang           CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Order:íihahl                  CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:íihid                   CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:íihíid                  CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:íisgä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:íisgáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:íiʼuhlä               CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:íiʼuhláa              CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:íiʼwä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:íiʼwáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Pl:íiʼwaʼáang             CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:íiʼuhláaʼagang   CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:íiʼuhláaʼagaang  CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:íiháalagang        CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:íiháalaagaang      CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:íihahlhid         CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:íihahlhíid        CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:íihahlsgä        CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:íihahlsgáa       CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:íihahlʼuhlä     CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:íihahlʼuhláa    CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Order:íihidhahl         CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:íihidsgä         CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:íihidsgáa        CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Order:íiʼuhlahahl     CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
