src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
chawíi:chaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {cha} to fall through the air" ;
cháamwii:cháamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {cháam} to fall through the air" ;
dabwíi:dabw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {dab} to fall through the air" ;
dagw% g̲íihlgii:dagw% g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to finish C, complete C, get C ready by working hard" ;
dáaʼadii:dáaʼad CLASS-II "for S to get pinched in, get narrowed in places" ;
dáalwii:dáalw CLASS-II "for S to come/go using the current or wind" ;
dámwii:dámw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {dám} to fall through the air" ;
dlawíi:dlaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {dla} to fall through the air" ;
dláamwii:dláamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {dláam} to fall through the air" ;
dúu% hlgaʼadíi:dúu% hlgaʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast and get O, to quickly grab O" ;
dúu% jahʼadíi:dúu% jahʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast and get O, to quickly grab O [said of untidy people]" ;
gabʼadíi:gabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to quickly come/go through, quickly penetrate [said of 1-D objects]" ;
gawíi:gaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {ga} to fall through the air" ;
gámwii:gámw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gám} to fall through the air" ;
gángwii:gángw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gáng} to fall through the air" ;
gáwwii:gáww CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gáw} to fall through the air" ;
gidwíi:gidw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gid} to fall through the air" ;
gistʼä% giwíi:gistʼä% giw CLASS-II "for S to take off C (sg) [said of a kerchief]" ;
giwándlii:giwándl CLASS-II "for S to jump aboard [either from a float, wharf or other boat]" ;
giwíi:giw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gi} to fall through the air" ;
gíi:g CLASS-II "for S to swim underwater (in direction) [said of fish and whales only]" ;
gíi% xabʼadíi:gíi% xabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to swim fast (in direction)" ;
gíiʼadii:gíiʼad CLASS-II "for S to seize or appropriate C (pl) (against debt for X), plunder C (pl)" ;
gíihlä% gíi:gíihlä% g CLASS-II "for it to be slack high water" ;
gíisdlagii:gíisdlag CLASS-II "for there to be slack water (high or low) now" ;
gíng% k̲ʼadíi:gíng% k̲ʼad CLASS-II "for S to bewitch C (sg), turn C (sg) into a witch" ;
guwíi:guw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gu} to fall through the air" ;
gyaa% xabʼadíi:gyaa% xabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run in fear (in direction)" ;
gyáa% kʼwíi:gyáa% kʼw CLASS-II "for S to accuse someone of witchcraft or sorcery" ;
gyáamwii:gyáamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {gyáam} to fall through the air" ;
g̲agwíi:g̲agw CLASS-II "V for a long time (yet)" ;
g̲awíi:g̲aw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {g̲a} to fall through the air" ;
g̲íihlgii:g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to be ready, completed" ;
g̲ámwii:g̲ámw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {g̲ám} to fall through the air" ;
hlgáamwii:hlgáamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hlgáam} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲awíi:hlg̲aw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hlg̲a} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲áawaandlii:hlg̲áawaandl CLASS-II "for S to take on ballast, ballast the boat" ;
hlg̲i% g̲íihlgii:hlg̲i% g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to finish C, complete C, get C ready by digging" ;
hlki% stlʼuwíi:hlki% stlʼuw CLASS-II "for S to kindle a fire with a firedrill" ;
hlkʼuwíi:hlkʼuw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hlkʼu} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲ámwii:hlk̲ámw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hlk̲ám} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲ʼwáahlwii:hlk̲ʼwáahlw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hlk̲ʼwáahl} to fall through the air" ;
hltʼahlwíi:hltʼahlw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hltʼahl} to fall through the air" ;
hltámwii:hltámw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {hltám} to fall through the air" ;
jahlíi:jahl CLASS-II "to V most, to be the V-est" ;
jawíi:jaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {ja} to fall through the air" ;
jíiwii:jíiw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {jíi} to fall through the air" ;
kʼa%.áatʼä% chaʼadíi:kʼa%.áatʼä% chaʼad CLASS-II "for S to throw C (pl) {cha} fast (in direction)" ;
kʼa%.áatʼä% xabʼadíi:kʼa%.áatʼä% xabʼad CLASS-II "for S to throw C (pl) fast (in direction)" ;
ki% stlʼuwíi:ki% stlʼuw CLASS-II "for S to kindle a fire by hitting rocks together" ;
kʼitsʼä% tíi:kʼitsʼä% t CLASS-II "for S to sneak away to bed, sneak away to have sex" ;
kíl% k̲ʼadíi:kíl% k̲ʼad CLASS-II "for S to put C (sg) to sleep with their voice" ;
kusad% dluwíi:kusad% dluw CLASS-II "for S to do something stupid and get what they deserve as a result" ;
kʼuwíi:kʼuw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {kʼu} to fall through the air" ;
kúnwii:kúnw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {kún} to fall through the air" ;
kʼwáahlwii:kʼwáahlw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {kʼwáahl} to fall through the air" ;
kyah% kʼwíi:kyah% kʼw CLASS-II "for S to give a name to O (sg), to name O (sg)" ;
k̲a% dluwíi:k̲a% dluw CLASS-II "for S to decrease in size a bit from previous years [said of salmon]" ;
k̲ʼadíi:k̲ʼad CLASS-II "for S (sg) to go to sleep (in direction)" ;
k̲asaa% g̲adlíi:k̲asaa% g̲adl CLASS-II "for S (sg) to leave quickly on a boat (in direction) [applies to any type of boat other than a rowboat]" ;
k̲asa%.a% tsʼáandlii:k̲asa%.a% tsʼáandl CLASS-II "for S (sg) to be aboard a vehicle and ready to go" ;
k̲áwwii:k̲áww CLASS-II "for S (sg) {k̲áw} to fall through the air" ;
k̲ʼi% g̲íihlgii:k̲ʼi% g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to finish C, complete C, get C ready by carving" ;
k̲ʼíiʼadii:k̲ʼíiʼad CLASS-II "for the skin on S to crack up [said of a body part]" ;
k̲ʼu% jahlíi:k̲ʼu% jahl CLASS-II "for S to make themselves sick by overeating" ;
k̲ʼúnwii:k̲ʼúnw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {k̲ʼún} to fall through the air" ;
málwii:málw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {mál} to fall through the air" ;
sdawíi:sdaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {sda} to fall through the air" ;
sgabwíi:sgabw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {sgab} to fall through the air" ;
sgáamwii:sgáamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {sgáam} to fall through the air" ;
sgi% g̲íihlgii:sgi% g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to finish C, complete C, get C ready by chopping" ;
sgihlʼadíi:sgihlʼad CLASS-II "for S to cut the umbilical cord of C (pl)" ;
sg̲áamwii:sg̲áamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {sg̲áam} to fall through the air" ;
sg̲áay% g̲awíi:sg̲áay% g̲aw CLASS-II "for S to yawn" ;
skáawii:skáaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {skáa} to fall through the air" ;
sk̲udwíi:sk̲udw CLASS-II "for S to pick C by knocking them off with the side of their hand [said of red huckleberries]" ;
snahwíi:snahw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {snah} to fall through the air" ;
stlʼáamwii:stlʼáamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {stlʼáam} to fall through the air" ;
stlúuwii:stlúuw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {stlúu} to fall through the air" ;
ta% hlg̲awíi:ta% hlg̲aw CLASS-II "for S to be all abuzz, to be stirred up [said of a town or a large group of people]" ;
tʼabwíi:tʼabw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tʼab} to fall through the air" ;
tʼáamwii:tʼáamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tʼáam} to fall through the air" ;
tʼáwwii:tʼáww CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tʼáw} to fall through the air" ;
tíiwii:tíiw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tíi} to fall through the air" ;
tla% g̲íihlgii:tla% g̲íihlg CLASS-II "for S to finish C, complete C, get C ready by working on it with their hands" ;
tla% k̲ʼadíi:tla% k̲ʼad CLASS-II "for S to anesthetize C (sg), knock C (sg) out with anesthetic" ;
tlaʼadíi:tlaʼad CLASS-II "for S to divide C up, divide C in two, share out C" ;
tlʼawíi:tlʼaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tlʼa} to fall through the air" ;
tlʼuwíi:tlʼuw CLASS-II "for S to become paralyzed on one side" ;
tsʼaswíi:tsʼasw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {tsʼas} to fall through the air" ;
xabʼadíi:xabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to quickly come/go through (in direction), to quickly penetrate (in direction)" ;
xawíi:xaw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {xa} to fall through the air [either mass or discrete]" ;
xál% tʼáwʼadii:xál% tʼáwʼad CLASS-II "for sparks to shoot out of the fire (in direction)" ;
xi% dabʼadíi:xi% dabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast [said of people with big stomachs]" ;
xi% gwaʼadíi:xi% gwaʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast" ;
xi% jahʼadíi:xi% jahʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast [said of untidy people]" ;
xi% xabʼadíi:xi% xabʼad CLASS-II "for S (pl) to run fast, fly fast" ;
xwíi+VAL/P:xw CLASS-II "for S to feel cold [said of a person only]" ;
x̲áamwii:x̲áamw CLASS-II "for S (sg) {x̲áam} to fall through the air" ;
yáadgaang% k̲ʼadíi:yáadgaang% k̲ʼad CLASS-II "for S to rock C to sleep in their arms [said of a baby]" ;
